Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.44.900

Decodifications and additions to this chapter.

RCW 9.79.140, 9.79.150, 9.79.160, 9.79.170 as now or hereafter amended, 9.79.180 as now or hereafter amended, 9.79.190 as now or hereafter amended, 9.79.200 as now or hereafter amended, 9.79.210 as now or hereafter amended, 9.79.220 as now or hereafter amended, 9A.88.020, and 9A.88.100 are each decodified and are each added to Title 9A RCW as a new chapter with the designation chapter 9A.44 RCW.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 244 s 17.]